src/fst/morphology/affixes/exceptional_declinations.lexc
LEXICON POOLTEIST     ! only (pool)teist; much like TEINE ?
                  
                  :#teist SG_NOMINATIVE ;
                  :e#teise N_SG_SUBPARA ;      ! pooleteise etc          
                  :t#teis%>t SG_PARTITIVE ;    ! pooltteist
         +Usage/Rare:#teis NE_S_COMMON ;         ! poolteise etc
                  :e#teise%>sse SG_ILLATIVE ;  ! 
         +Usage/Rare:#teise%>sse SG_ILLATIVE ;   ! 

LEXICON TUHAT    ! only tuhat; like LOHAKAS

                  :t SG_NOMINATIVE ;     ! tuhat
                  :nde 2C ;           ! tuhande etc
       ! ????     :%>t SG_PARTITIVE ;    ! tuhat

LEXICON TÕRI    ! only kuulmetõri; similar to talv (tali) and põlv (põli), but even older

                  :i SG_NOMINATIVE ;              ! tõri
                  :v EIT ;                        ! tõrve etc

LEXICON VAHER    ! VVS 3 unstable (closed) type;  only vaher, aher

                  :%{W%} SG_NOMINATIVE ;    ! vaher
                  :a 2C ;                ! vahtra etc

LEXICON VARS    !  VVS 14 unstable (closed) type;

! %{W%} here helps to select the right paradigm slots for stem change;
! it does not really stand for "weak grade"

                  : SG_NOMINATIVE ;               ! vars
                  :e%{W%} N_SG_SUBPARA ;       ! varre etc 
                  :%>t SG_PARTITIVE ;             ! vart
                  :%{S%}%>de SG_ILL_VARIANT ;  ! varde
                  :e%{W%} SG_ILL_VARIANT ;     ! varresse 
                  : TE_PL ;    ! varte etc 
                  :%>i PL_PARTITIVE ;    ! varsi
      !   +Usage/Hyp:%>i N_VOWEL_PL_SUBPARA ;    ! varsil?; except for some expressions (uusil)

LEXICON VÄIKE    ! only väike(ne)  VVS 10

                  : XÄIKE ;
         +Usage/Rare:kese%>id PL_PARTITIVE ;    ! väikeseid
                  :kse%>id PL_PARTITIVE ;     ! väikseid

LEXICON XÄIKE    ! VVS 10 common part of väike(ne), päike(ne), äike(ne)

                  :ke SG_NOMINATIVE ;
         +Usage/Rare:kene SG_NOMINATIVE ;
                  :kene NE_S_COMMON ;
         +Usage/Rare:kse N_SG_SUBPARA ;    ! xäikse etc 
         +Usage/Rare:kse%>t SG_PARTITIVE ;    ! xäikset
                  :kese%>sse SG_ILLATIVE ;    ! xäikesesse
         +Usage/Rare:kse%>sse SG_ILLATIVE ;    ! xäiksesse
         +Usage/Rare:ke%>sse SG_ILLATIVE ;    ! xäikesse (haplology)
         +Usage/Rare:kse TE_PL ;       
         +Usage/Rare:kes%>i PL_PARTITIVE ;      ! xäikesi
      +Usage/Rare+Pl:kes%>i LOCATIVES_PLUS ;    ! xäikesil etc
         +Usage/Rare:kese%>i N_VOWEL_PL_SUBPARA ;    ! xäikeseil etc
         +Usage/Rare:kse%>i N_VOWEL_PL_SUBPARA ;    ! xäikseil etc

LEXICON ÕLU    ! only õlu

                  :u SG_NOMINATIVE ;    ! õlu
                  :le N_SG_SUBPARA ;    ! õlle etc 
                  :u%>t SG_PARTITIVE ;    ! õlut
                  :le%>sse SG_ILLATIVE ;    ! õllesse 
                  :le DE_PL ;
                  :le%>sid PL_PARTITIVE ;    ! õllesid
         +Usage/Rare:u%>sid PL_PARTITIVE ;    ! õlusid
